Illinois, session 104th, SB750.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Task Force on Internationally-Licensed 5Health Care Professionals Act is amended by changing Section 1 6as follows: 7    (225 ILCS 53/1)8    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the Task 9Force on Internationally-Licensed Health Care Professionals 10Act.11(Source: P.A. 102-812, eff. 1-1-23.)